Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-426.02
Lottery or raffle; progressive jackpot; multiple drawing dates; requirements; vending or dispensing device, authorized.

(1) A licensed organization may conduct a lottery or raffle that includes a progressive jackpot and multiple drawing dates for a game such as, but not limited to, the Queen of Hearts. In order to conduct a lottery or raffle in the method described in this section, such licensee shall (a) register each such lottery or raffle game with the department and (b) post the rules for such lottery or raffle in a visible location where such lottery or raffle is conducted or where tickets for such lottery or raffle are sold.

(2) A licensed organization may sell a ticket for a lottery or raffle conducted pursuant to this section through a vending or dispensing device.

(3) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the conduct of a lottery or raffle utilizing the method authorized pursuant to this section.

Laws 2026, LB1001, § 23.
July 1, 2026